Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Chapter 2 Oaths

Cross references. —

As to oath of office, see art. 6, §§ 20 and 21, Wyo. Const.

As to perjury generally, see §

6-5-301

.

As to disobeying subpoena, refusing to take oath or to answer questions, see §

6-5-306

.

For provision requiring witnesses to be sworn before grand jury, see §

7-5-205

.

As to oath of jury in criminal cases generally, see §

7-11-107

.

For provision that the manner of procuring and examining witnesses in criminal cases shall be as provided by the Code of Civil Procedure, see §

7-11-403

.

As to acknowledgment of instruments by members of armed forces before commissioned officers, see §

19-11-202

.

As to form of oath required to register to vote, see §

22-3-103

.

As to notary public, see title 32.

For Wyoming Uniform Law on Notarial Acts, see § 34-26-101 et seq.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

58 Am. Jur. 2d Oath and Affirmation § 1 et seq.

Validity of governmental requirement of oath of allegiance or loyalty, 18 ALR2d 268.

67 C.J.S. Oaths and Affirmations §§ 1 to 13.

§ 1-2-101.
Form.

A person may be sworn
by any form he deems binding on his conscience.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 4; R.S. 1887, § 2340; R.S. 1899, § 3422; C.S. 1910, § 4265; C.S. 1920, § 5534; R.S. 1931, § 89-104; C.S. 1945, § 3-2801; W.S. 1957, § 1-8; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1.

§ 1-2-102.
Officers authorized to administer.

The following officers are authorized to administer oaths:

Justices of the Wyoming supreme court;

Judges of the Wyoming district courts;

Judge of the United States district court for the district of Wyoming;

Clerks of the Wyoming supreme court, Wyoming district courts and Wyoming circuit courts;

Clerk of the United States district court for the district of Wyoming;

Commissioners and magistrates appointed by authority of the laws of the United States or of Wyoming;

Repealed by Laws 2011, ch. 113, § 3.

County clerks;

County treasurers;

Clerks of school districts in Wyoming;

Clerks of any incorporated city or town in Wyoming;

County commissioners within their respective counties;

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 168, § 202.

Judges of the Wyoming circuit courts;

Notarial officers.

Except for notarial officers, officers listed in this section are authorized to administer oaths, but are not authorized to perform other notarial acts as defined in W.S. 32-3-102(a)(xviii), unless specified otherwise in W.S. 32-3-105(a).

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 2, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 4295; Laws 1905, ch. 23, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 5156; C.S. 1920, § 6432; R.S. 1931, § 89-1501; C.S. 1945, § 3-2802; Laws 1953, ch. 29, § 1; 1955, ch. 156, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 1-9; Laws 1969, ch. 13, § 1; 1977, ch. 188, § 1; 1991, ch. 99, § 1; 2008, ch. 20, § 2; 2009, ch. 168, § 202; 2011, ch. 113, §§ 2, 3; 2012, ch. 98, § 1; 2021 ch. 27, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

Cross references. —

For provision that master commissioner or special master has the same power to administer oaths as the sheriff, see §

1-17-323

.

As to authority of state auditor and state treasurer to administer oaths, see §

9-1-401

.

For authority of members of Wyoming aeronautics commission to administer oaths and affirmations, see §

10-3-301

.

For authority of commissioned officers to administer oath required on enlistment in national guard, see §

19-9-302

.

As to administering oath to trustees of a school district, see §

21-3-106

.

For authority of trustees of school districts to administer oaths, see §

21-3-122

.

For authority of secretary of board of trustees of the University of Wyoming to administer oaths, see §

21-17-206

.

As to authority of election judges to administer oaths, see §

22-15-105

.

As to authority of officers, employees, agents or selling agents authorized by state game and fish commission to sell and issue licenses and permits to administer oaths, see §

23-1-701

.

For authority of employees of highway department to administer oaths to each other and to witnesses, see §

24-3-116

.

For authority of insurance commissioner to administer oaths or affirmations, see §§

26-2-116

to

26-2-118

,

26-2-122

,

26-2-123

.

As to power of commissioner of labor and statistics to administer oaths, see §

27-2-109

.

For power of members of employment service commission and their authorized representatives to administer oaths, see §

27-3-602

.

For authority of inspector of mines to administer oaths, see §

30-2-212

.

For authority of members and secretary of Wyoming oil and gas conservation commission to administer oaths, see §§

30-5-103

and

30-5-112

.

For authority of state board of architects to administer oaths, see §

33-4-104

.

As to persons authorized to administer oaths to new attorneys, see §

33-5-112

.

For authority of board of chiropractors to administer oaths, see §

33-10-104

.

For authority of state board of embalming to administer oaths, see §

33-16-304

.

As to authority of members of board of examiners and optometry to administer oaths, see §

33-23-105

.

For authority of engineering and surveying board to administer oaths, see § 33-29-119.

For authority of state director of public health to administer oaths, see §

35-1-240

.

As to authority of members of board of land commissioners to administer oaths, see §

36-2-102

.

For authority of commissioner of land to administer oaths, see §§

36-3-107

and

36-7-404

.

For authority of members of public service commission to administer oaths, see §§

37-2-206

.

For authority of members of board of control to administer oaths, see §

41-4-211

.

For authority of superintendent of water division to administer oaths, see §

41-4-306

.

For provision that depositions may be taken before an officer authorized to administer oaths, see Rule 28, W.R.C.P.

For Wyoming Uniform Law on Notarial Acts, see § 34-26-101 et seq.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, added (b).

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, deleted (a)(xiii) which read: “Justices of the peace within their respective counties.”

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, repealed former (a)(vii), which read: “Notaries public”; added (a)(xv); and in (b), inserted “Except for notarial officers,” and deleted “32-1-105(c) or” preceding “34-26-103(a).”

The 2012 amendment,

substituted “circuit” for “county” in (a)(iv) and (a)(xiv).

Laws 2012, ch. 98 § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 15, 2012.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, in (b), substituted "32-3-102(a)(xviii)" for "34-26-101(b)(iii)" and "32-3-105(a)" for "34-26-103(a)."

Editor's notes. —

This section as originally enacted provided, in addition, for the administration of oaths by the clerk and the judge of the United States circuit court including the state of Wyoming. United States circuit courts have been abolished and their powers and duties transferred to district courts.

Failure to follow statutory provisions exactly. —

In proceeding to condemn land for highway where appraisers were not sworn by themselves and instead by county clerk, failure to follow provisions of statute exactly would be mere irregularity not subject to collateral attack. Miller v. Hagie, 59 Wyo. 383, 140 P.2d 746,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1943).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Disqualification of official empowered to administer oath when he is attorney for person taking oath, 21 ALR3d 483.

§ 1-2-103.
Affirmation in lieu of oath; manner of administering.

Persons conscientiously
opposed to swearing or to taking any oath may affirm, and are subject
to the penalties of perjury as in the case of swearing an oath. Whenever
any person is required to take an oath in any court, or before any
person or officer authorized by law to administer oaths, it is lawful
for the court, officer or person administering the same, to administer
it in the following manner: the person taking the oath or swearing
shall, with his or her right hand uplifted, swear or take the oath,
concluding with the words “so help me God”.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 2, § 2; R.S. 1899, § 4296; C.S. 1910, § 5157; C.S. 1920, § 6433; R.S. 1931, § 89-1502; C.S. 1945, § 3-2803; W.S. 1957, § 1-10; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to penalties for perjury, see §

6-5-301

.

Perjury charge supported by proof oath administered by clerk
of court. —

Under this section and §

5-7-101

, declaring that, in the performance of his duties, the clerk of court shall be under the direction of the court, and providing for the administering of oaths, an averment in an information charging perjury that the accused was in due form of law sworn by the court, having competent authority to administer to him the oath of a witness before the court, is supported by the proof that the oath was administered to him by the clerk. Fletcher v. State, 20 Wyo. 284, 123 P. 80,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. 1912).

§ 1-2-104.
Certification
of documents.

A matter required or authorized to be supported, evidenced, established or proven by the sworn statement, declaration, verification, certificate, oath or affidavit, in writing of the person making it, other than a deposition, an acknowledgment, an oath of office or an oath required to be taken before a specified official other than a notary public, may be supported, evidenced, established or proven by the person certifying in writing “under penalty of false swearing” that the matter is true. The certification shall state the date and place of execution and the following:

“I certify under penalty
of false swearing that the foregoing is true”.

A person who knowingly makes a false certification under subsection (a) of this section is guilty of false swearing in violation of W.S. 6-5-303(c).

History.

Laws 2007, ch. 199, § 1.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2007, ch. 199, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2007.

Quoted in

Harmon v. Star Valley Med. Ctr., 2014 WY 90,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 99

(Jul 16, 2014).